Utah statutes.
76-10-111.   Prohibition of gift or free distribution of smokeless tobacco
or electronic cigarettes -- Exceptions.
(1)  The Legislature finds that:
(a)  smokeless tobacco, or chewing tobacco, is harmful to the health of
individuals who use those products because research indicates that they may
cause mouth or oral cancers;
(b)  the use of smokeless tobacco among juveniles in this state is increasing
rapidly;
(c)  the use of electronic cigarettes may lead to unhealthy behavior such as
the use of tobacco products; and
(d)  it is necessary to restrict the gift of the products described in this
Subsection (1) in the interest of the health of the citizens of this state.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), it is unlawful for a manufacturer,
wholesaler, and retailer to give or distribute without charge any smokeless
tobacco, chewing tobacco, or electronic cigarette in this state.  Any person
who violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor for the first
offense, and is guilty of a class B misdemeanor for any subsequent offense.
(3) (a)  Smokeless tobacco, chewing tobacco, or an electronic cigarette may be
distributed to adults without charge at professional conventions where the
general public is excluded.
(b)  Subsection (2) does not apply to a retailer, manufacturer, or distributor
who gives smokeless tobacco, chewing tobacco, or an electronic cigarette to a
person of legal age upon the person's purchase of another tobacco product or
electronic cigarette.
